Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Surrender

6-1-301. Surrender of charter.

After the adoption of this charter and the election of the first board of mayor and aldermen, no election for the surrender of this charter shall be called or held for a period of four (4) years from the date the first board takes office.

After the expiration of the four-year period, an election to surrender the charter may be held. In order for a surrender election to be held, a petition requesting surrender of the charter must be filed in the same manner and contain the signatures of the same number of registered voters as provided for the adoption of this charter. The petition must pray for a surrender of the charter and must be accompanied by a cash bond to be posted by the petitioners to cover the cost of the election. In case of a failure to surrender the charter, future elections to surrender it shall not be held more frequently than at four-year intervals.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-1-301 — 6-1-304 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 14; 1877, ch. 121, § 1; Shan., §§ 1904-1907; Code 1932, §§ 3315-3318; Acts 1970, ch. 426, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-122 — 6-125), concerning existing municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-1-302. Conduct of surrender election.

The county election commission has the same duties with respect to an election for the surrender of a charter as it has with respect to an election to adopt a charter under this title.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-1-301 — 6-1-304 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 14; 1877, ch. 121, § 1; Shan., §§ 1904-1907; Code 1932, §§ 3315-3318; Acts 1970, ch. 426, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-122 — 6-125), concerning existing municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-303. Termination of charter — New charter.

If a majority of the votes cast in the election favor the termination of this form of government, this charter shall terminate at one (1) minute after midnight (12:01 a.m.) on the sixtieth day next following the date of the election, unless this falls upon Sunday or a holiday, in which case it shall terminate at one (1) minute after midnight (12:01 a.m.) on the next day. If, before the adoption of this charter, the municipality functioned under a different charter, then upon termination of this charter the prior charter shall become effective at the time provided for in this section. Territory previously unincorporated shall revert to that status. Another charter, however, may be adopted, and the question of whether or not another charter shall be adopted may be placed on the ballots used in the election mentioned in this section, if the petition filed requests that, and if all other necessary legal steps to adopt the other charter have been taken.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-1-301 — 6-1-304 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 14; 1877, ch. 121, § 1; Shan., §§ 1904-1907; Code 1932, §§ 3315-3318; Acts 1970, ch. 426, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-122 — 6-125), concerning existing municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-304. Election of new officers when charter is surrendered.

If there was a previously incorporated municipality or if a new charter is adopted as provided in § 6-1-303, the county election commission shall call an election not more than sixty-two (62) days following the election for surrender of this charter, at which time municipal officials for the newly adopted form of government shall be chosen who shall take office immediately after the election.

The previous board shall hold over until the newly elected officers take office.

The qualifying deadline for filing nominating petitions shall be as described in § 2-5-101.

All registered voters of the municipality may vote in the election.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-1-301 — 6-1-304 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 14; 1877, ch. 121, § 1; Shan., §§ 1904-1907; Code 1932, §§ 3315-3318; Acts 1970, ch. 426, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-122 — 6-125), concerning existing municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-305. Succession to assets, liabilities and obligations after surrender of charter.

In case of a reversion to a former charter or adoption of a new one simultaneously with the surrender of the old, all assets, liabilities and obligations of the old municipality shall become those of the new municipality.

In the event a municipality reverts to unincorporated status, the board of mayor and aldermen shall become trustees of the property and funds of the former municipality, and, under such bonds as may be required by the county legislative body, shall proceed to terminate the affairs of the municipality and dispose of its property.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-1-301 — 6-1-304 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 14; 1877, ch. 121, § 1; Shan., §§ 1904-1907; Code 1932, §§ 3315-3318; Acts 1970, ch. 426, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-122 — 6-125), concerning existing municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-306. Liquidation of affairs.

If the property and funds are more than sufficient to meet the municipality's obligations, the surplus shall be paid into the treasury of the county to become a part of its general fund.

If the property and funds are insufficient to meet all the municipality's current obligations, the county legislative body may levy and collect taxes upon the property within the boundaries of the former municipality and pay the revenue to the trustees for the purpose of meeting the current deficit.

The trustees shall terminate the affairs of the municipality as soon as possible, but in no event shall the trusteeship continue for more than thirty-six (36) months. Any matters, including obligations maturing after thirty-six (36) months, not disposed of within the thirty-six-month period shall become the responsibility of the county legislative body of the county in which the municipality is located.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 6-1-301 — 6-1-304 (Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 14; 1877, ch. 121, § 1; Shan., §§ 1904-1907; Code 1932, §§ 3315-3318; Acts 1970, ch. 426, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-122 — 6-125), concerning existing municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.